dictionaries/fr_FR/fr_FR.aff
FLAG long
SFX c1 Y 239
SFX c1 r r/n'q'd' er
SFX c1 er ant/n'q' [^cg]er
SFX c1 ecer ecant/n'q' ecer
SFX c1 eger egeant/n'q' eger
SFX c1 er e/q' er
SFX c1 ebrer ebre/n'j' ebrer
SFX c1 ecer ece/n'j' ecer
SFX c1 echer eche/n'j' echer
SFX c1 ecrer ecre/n'j' ecrer
SFX c1 eder ede/n'j' eder
SFX c1 eger ege/n'j' eger
SFX c1 egler egle/n'j' egler
SFX c1 egner egne/n'j' egner
SFX c1 egrer egre/n'j' egrer
SFX c1 eguer egue/n'j' eguer
SFX c1 eler ele/n'j' eler
SFX c1 emer eme/n'j' emer
SFX c1 ener ene/n'j' ener
SFX c1 eper epe/n'j' eper
SFX c1 equer eque/n'j' equer
SFX c1 erer ere/n'j' erer
SFX c1 eser ese/n'j' eser
SFX c1 eter ete/n'j' eter
SFX c1 etrer etre/n'j' etrer
SFX c1 evrer evre/n'j' evrer
SFX c1 eyer eye/n'j' eyer
SFX c1 ebrer ebres/n' ebrer
SFX c1 ecer eces/n' ecer
SFX c1 echer eches/n' echer
SFX c1 ecrer ecres/n' ecrer
SFX c1 eder edes/n' eder
SFX c1 eger eges/n' eger
SFX c1 egler egles/n' egler
SFX c1 egner egnes/n' egner
SFX c1 egrer egres/n' egrer
SFX c1 eguer egues/n' eguer
SFX c1 eler eles/n' eler
SFX c1 emer emes/n' emer
SFX c1 ener enes/n' ener
SFX c1 eper epes/n' eper
SFX c1 equer eques/n' equer
SFX c1 erer eres/n' erer
SFX c1 eser eses/n' eser
SFX c1 eter etes/n' eter
SFX c1 etrer etres/n' etrer
SFX c1 evrer evres/n' evrer
SFX c1 eyer eyes/n' eyer
SFX c1 ebrer ebre/n'q' ebrer
SFX c1 ecer ece/n'q' ecer
SFX c1 echer eche/n'q' echer
SFX c1 ecrer ecre/n'q' ecrer
SFX c1 eder ede/n'q' eder
SFX c1 eger ege/n'q' eger
SFX c1 egler egle/n'q' egler
SFX c1 egner egne/n'q' egner
SFX c1 egrer egre/n'q' egrer
SFX c1 eguer egue/n'q' eguer
SFX c1 eler ele/n'q' eler
SFX c1 emer eme/n'q' emer
SFX c1 ener ene/n'q' ener
SFX c1 eper epe/n'q' eper
SFX c1 equer eque/n'q' equer
SFX c1 erer ere/n'q' erer
SFX c1 eser ese/n'q' eser
SFX c1 eter ete/n'q' eter
SFX c1 etrer etre/n'q' etrer
SFX c1 evrer evre/n'q' evrer
SFX c1 eyer eye/n'q' eyer
SFX c1 er ons/n' [^cg]er
SFX c1 ecer econs/n' ecer
SFX c1 eger egeons/n' eger
SFX c1 er ez/n' er
SFX c1 ebrer ebrent/n'q' ebrer
SFX c1 ecer ecent/n'q' ecer
SFX c1 echer echent/n'q' echer
SFX c1 ecrer ecrent/n'q' ecrer
SFX c1 eder edent/n'q' eder
SFX c1 eger egent/n'q' eger
SFX c1 egler eglent/n'q' egler
SFX c1 egner egnent/n'q' egner
SFX c1 egrer egrent/n'q' egrer
SFX c1 eguer eguent/n'q' eguer
SFX c1 eler elent/n'q' eler
SFX c1 emer ement/n'q' emer
SFX c1 ener enent/n'q' ener
SFX c1 eper epent/n'q' eper
SFX c1 equer equent/n'q' equer
SFX c1 erer erent/n'q' erer
SFX c1 eser esent/n'q' eser
SFX c1 eter etent/n'q' eter
SFX c1 etrer etrent/n'q' etrer
SFX c1 evrer evrent/n'q' evrer
SFX c1 eyer eyent/n'q' eyer
SFX c1 er ais/n'j' [^cg]er
SFX c1 ecer ecais/n'j' ecer
SFX c1 eger egeais/n'j' eger
SFX c1 er ais/n' [^cg]er
SFX c1 ecer ecais/n' ecer
SFX c1 eger egeais/n' eger
SFX c1 er ait/n'q' [^cg]er
SFX c1 ecer ecait/n'q' ecer
SFX c1 eger egeait/n'q' eger
SFX c1 er ions/n' er
SFX c1 er iez/n' er
SFX c1 er aient/n'q' [^cg]er
SFX c1 ecer ecaient/n'q' ecer
SFX c1 eger egeaient/n'q' eger
SFX c1 er ai/n'j' [^cg]er
SFX c1 ecer ecai/n'j' ecer
SFX c1 eger egeai/n'j' eger
SFX c1 er as/n' [^cg]er
SFX c1 ecer ecas/n' ecer
SFX c1 eger egeas/n' eger
SFX c1 er a/n'q' [^cg]er
SFX c1 ecer eca/n'q' ecer
SFX c1 eger egea/n'q' eger
SFX c1 er ames/n' [^cg]er
SFX c1 ecer ecames/n' ecer
SFX c1 eger egeames/n' eger
SFX c1 er ates/n' [^cg]er
SFX c1 ecer ecates/n' ecer
SFX c1 eger egeates/n' eger
SFX c1 er erent/n'q' er
SFX c1 er erai/n'j' er
SFX c1 er eras/n' er
SFX c1 er era/n'q' er
SFX c1 er erons/n' er
SFX c1 er erez/n' er
SFX c1 er eront/n'q' er
SFX c1 er erais/n'j' er
SFX c1 er erais/n' er
SFX c1 er erait/n'q' er
SFX c1 er erions/n' er
SFX c1 er eriez/n' er
SFX c1 er eraient/n'q' er
SFX c1 ebrer ebre/n'j' ebrer
SFX c1 ecer ece/n'j' ecer
SFX c1 echer eche/n'j' echer
SFX c1 ecrer ecre/n'j' ecrer
SFX c1 eder ede/n'j' eder
SFX c1 eger ege/n'j' eger
SFX c1 egler egle/n'j' egler
SFX c1 egner egne/n'j' egner
SFX c1 egrer egre/n'j' egrer
SFX c1 eguer egue/n'j' eguer
SFX c1 eler ele/n'j' eler
SFX c1 emer eme/n'j' emer
SFX c1 ener ene/n'j' ener
SFX c1 eper epe/n'j' eper
SFX c1 equer eque/n'j' equer
SFX c1 erer ere/n'j' erer
SFX c1 eser ese/n'j' eser
SFX c1 eter ete/n'j' eter
SFX c1 etrer etre/n'j' etrer
SFX c1 evrer evre/n'j' evrer
SFX c1 eyer eye/n'j' eyer
SFX c1 ebrer ebres/n' ebrer
SFX c1 ecer eces/n' ecer
SFX c1 echer eches/n' echer
SFX c1 ecrer ecres/n' ecrer
SFX c1 eder edes/n' eder
SFX c1 eger eges/n' eger
SFX c1 egler egles/n' egler
SFX c1 egner egnes/n' egner
SFX c1 egrer egres/n' egrer
SFX c1 eguer egues/n' eguer
SFX c1 eler eles/n' eler
SFX c1 emer emes/n' emer
SFX c1 ener enes/n' ener
SFX c1 eper epes/n' eper
SFX c1 equer eques/n' equer
SFX c1 erer eres/n' erer
SFX c1 eser eses/n' eser
SFX c1 eter etes/n' eter
SFX c1 etrer etres/n' etrer
SFX c1 evrer evres/n' evrer
SFX c1 eyer eyes/n' eyer
SFX c1 ebrer ebre/n'q' ebrer
SFX c1 ecer ece/n'q' ecer
SFX c1 echer eche/n'q' echer
SFX c1 ecrer ecre/n'q' ecrer
SFX c1 eder ede/n'q' eder
SFX c1 eger ege/n'q' eger
SFX c1 egler egle/n'q' egler
SFX c1 egner egne/n'q' egner
SFX c1 egrer egre/n'q' egrer
SFX c1 eguer egue/n'q' eguer
SFX c1 eler ele/n'q' eler
SFX c1 emer eme/n'q' emer
SFX c1 ener ene/n'q' ener
SFX c1 eper epe/n'q' eper
SFX c1 equer eque/n'q' equer
SFX c1 erer ere/n'q' erer
SFX c1 eser ese/n'q' eser
SFX c1 eter ete/n'q' eter
SFX c1 etrer etre/n'q' etrer
SFX c1 evrer evre/n'q' evrer
SFX c1 eyer eye/n'q' eyer
SFX c1 er ions/n' er
SFX c1 er iez/n' er
SFX c1 ebrer ebrent/n'q' ebrer
SFX c1 ecer ecent/n'q' ecer
SFX c1 echer echent/n'q' echer
SFX c1 ecrer ecrent/n'q' ecrer
SFX c1 eder edent/n'q' eder
SFX c1 eger egent/n'q' eger
SFX c1 egler eglent/n'q' egler
SFX c1 egner egnent/n'q' egner
SFX c1 egrer egrent/n'q' egrer
SFX c1 eguer eguent/n'q' eguer
SFX c1 eler elent/n'q' eler
SFX c1 emer ement/n'q' emer
SFX c1 ener enent/n'q' ener
SFX c1 eper epent/n'q' eper
SFX c1 equer equent/n'q' equer
SFX c1 erer erent/n'q' erer
SFX c1 eser esent/n'q' eser
SFX c1 eter etent/n'q' eter
SFX c1 etrer etrent/n'q' etrer
SFX c1 evrer evrent/n'q' evrer
SFX c1 eyer eyent/n'q' eyer
SFX c1 er asse/n'j' [^cg]er
SFX c1 ecer ecasse/n'j' ecer
SFX c1 eger egeasse/n'j' eger
SFX c1 er asses/n' [^cg]er
SFX c1 ecer ecasses/n' ecer
SFX c1 eger egeasses/n' eger
SFX c1 er at/n'q' [^cg]er
SFX c1 ecer ecat/n'q' ecer
SFX c1 eger egeat/n'q' eger
SFX c1 er assions/n' [^cg]er
SFX c1 ecer ecassions/n' ecer
SFX c1 eger egeassions/n' eger
SFX c1 er assiez/n' [^cg]er
SFX c1 ecer ecassiez/n' ecer
SFX c1 eger egeassiez/n' eger
SFX c1 er assent/n'q' [^cg]er
SFX c1 ecer ecassent/n'q' ecer
SFX c1 eger egeassent/n'q' eger
